lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Regbis > Regbio apsauginės priemonės: Regbio rankų apsaugos; Regbio kūno šarvai ir pečių apsaugos; Regbio kirkšnių apsaugos; Regbio galvos apdangalai; Regbio burnos apsaugos; Regbio apsauginiai šortai ir šlaunų apsaugos
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > รักบี้ > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันของรักบี้: สนับแขนรักบี้; เสื้อเกราะและสนับไหล่รักบี้; กระจับป้องกันรักบี้; หมวกรักบี้; ฟันยางรักบี้; กางเกงซับในกันกระแทกและสนับต้นขารักบี้
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Rugby > Rugby-Schutzkleidung: Rugby-Armschoner; Rugby-Schutzwesten & Schulterpolster; Tiefschutz für Rugby; Rugby-Helme; Zahnschutz für Rugby; Rugby-Schutzhosen & Oberschenkelschoner
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Rugby > Beskyttelsesutstyr for rugby: Armbeskyttere for rugby; Kroppsbeskyttelse og skulderbeskyttere for rugby; Skrittbeskyttere for rugby; Hodeplagg for rugby; Tannbeskyttere for rugby; Beskyttelsesshorts og lårbeskyttere for rugby
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Регби > Защитная экипировка для регби: Защита рук для регби; Защитные жилеты и наплечники для регби; Защита паха для регби; Шлемы для регби; Капы для регби; Защитные шорты и защита бедер для регби
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Rugby > Protezioni per rugby: Parabraccia per rugby; Corpetti protettivi e paraspalle per rugby; Conchiglie protettive per rugby; Caschi da rugby; Paradenti per rugby; Pantaloncini protettivi e cosciali per rugby
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Rugby > Ochraniacze do rugby: Ochraniacze na przedramiona do rugby; Kamizelki ochronne i ochraniacze ramion do rugby; Ochraniacze krocza do rugby; Kaski do rugby; Ochraniacze na zęby do rugby; Spodenki ochronne i ochraniacze na uda do rugby
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Rugby > Skyddsutrustning för rugby: Armskydd för rugby; Kroppsskydd och axelskydd för rugby; Suspensoarer för rugby; Rugbyhjälmar; Tandskydd för rugby; Skyddsshorts och lårskydd för rugby
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Rögbi > Rögbi-védőfelszerelés: Rögbi karvédők; Rögbi védőmellények és vállvédők; Rögbi ágyékvédők; Rögbifejfedő; Rögbi fogvédők; Rögbi védőnadrágok és combvédők
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Rugby > Beskyttelsesudstyr til rugby: Armbeskyttere til rugby; Kropsbeskyttelse og skulderpuder til rugby; Skridtbeskyttere til rugby; Rugbyhjelme; Tandbeskyttere til rugby; Beskyttelsesshorts og lårbeskyttere til rugby
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Rugby > Rugby Protective Gear: Rugby Arm Guards; Rugby Body Armor & Shoulder Pads; Rugby Groin Guards; Rugby Headgear; Rugby Mouthguards; Rugby Protective Shorts & Thigh Guards
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Rugby > Rugby-suojat: Rugbyn käsivarsisuojat; Rugbyn ylävartalo- ja hartiasuojat; Rugbyn alasuojat; Rugby-kypärät; Rugbyn hammassuojat; Rugbyn suojashortsit ja reisisuojat
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Ragby > Ochranné vybavenie na rugby: Chrániče predlaktí na ragby; Ragbyové nepriestrelné vesty a chrániče ramien; Chrániče slabín na ragby; Pokrývky hlavy na rugby; Chrániče zubov na ragby; Ochranné šortky a chrániče stehien na ragby
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Rugby > Equipamiento de protección para rugby: Protectores de brazo para rugby; Armaduras y hombreras de rugby; Protectores de ingle para rugby; Cascos de rugby; Protectores bucales de rugby; Pantalones cortos protectores y musleras de rugby
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Ragbi > Ragbi Koruyucu Kıyafetleri: Ragbi kol koruyucuları; Ragbi vücut koruyucuları ve omuzlukları; Ragbi kasık koruyucuları; Ragbi Kaskları; Ragbi dişlikleri; Ragbi koruyucu şortları ve uyluk koruyucuları
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Ръгби > Защитна екипировка за ръгби: Предпазители за ръце за ръгби; Защитна броня и раменни протектори за ръгби; Протектори за слабини за ръгби; Шапки за ръгби; Протектори за уста за ръгби; Защитни шорти и протектори за бедра за ръгби
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng bầu dục > Thiết bị bảo vệ bóng bầu dục: Đồ bảo vệ tay bóng bầu dục; Áo giáp & đệm bảo vệ vai bóng bầu dục; Đồ bảo vệ hạ bộ bóng bầu dục; Mũ chơi rugby; Đồ bảo vệ hàm bóng bầu dục; Quần bảo hộ & đồ bảo vệ đùi bóng bầu dục
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ラグビー > ラグビー用プロテクター: ラグビー用アームガード; ラグビー用ボディアーマー・ショルダーパッド; ラグビー用グロインガード; ラグビー用ヘッドギア; ラグビー用マウスガード; ラグビー用プロテクトショーツ・サイガード
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 럭비 > 럭비 보호 장비: 럭비 암 가드; 럭비 보디 아머 및 숄더 패드; 럭비 낭심 보호대; 럭비 헤드기어; 럭비 마우스가드; 럭비 보호용 반바지 및 허벅지 보호대
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Rugby > Protections de rugby: Protège-bras de rugby; Épaulières et plastrons de rugby; Coquilles de protection de rugby; Casques de rugby; Protège-dents de rugby; Shorts de protection et cuissards de rugby
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Rúgbi > Equipamento de proteção para rúgbi: Protetores de braço para rugby; Colete de proteção e ombreiras para rugby; Protetores pélvicos para rugby; Capacetes de rúgbi; Protetores bucais para rugby; Shorts de proteção e protetores de coxa para rugby
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Ragby > Ragbyové chrániče: Chrániče paží na ragby; Ragbyové chrániče těla a ramen; Ragbyové suspenzory; Ragbyové chrániče hlavy; Chrániče zubů na ragby; Ochranné šortky a chrániče stehen na ragby
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Rugby > Echipamente de protecție pentru rugby: Protecții de braț pentru rugby; Armură corporală și protecții de umăr pentru rugby; Protecții inghinale pentru rugby; Căști pentru rugby; Apărători dentare pentru rugby; Pantaloni de protecție și apărători de coapsă pentru rugby
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ράγκμπι > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός για ράγκμπι: Προστατευτικά χεριών ράγκμπι; Εξοπλισμός προστασίας σώματος και επωμίδες ράγκμπι; Προστατευτικά βουβωνικής χώρας ράγκμπι; Κράνη ράγκμπι; Μασελάκια ράγκμπι; Προστατευτικά σορτς και προστατευτικά μηρών ράγκμπι
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Râguebi > Equipamento de proteção para râguebi: Braçadeiras de proteção de râguebi; Armaduras e hombreiras de râguebi; Coquilhas de râguebi; Proteções de cabeça para râguebi; Goteiras de râguebi; Calções de proteção e coxeleiras de râguebi
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Rugby > Beschermende uitrusting voor rugby: Rugbyarmbeschermers; Rugby-bodyarmour en -schouderbeschermers; Rugbykruisbeschermers; Rugbyhelmen; Rugbygebitsbeschermers; Rugby-protectieshorts en -dijbeschermers
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 橄欖球 > 橄欖球護具: 橄欖球護臂; 橄欖球防摔衣與護肩; 橄欖球護襠; 橄欖球頭套; 橄欖球護齒; 橄欖球防摔褲與護大腿墊
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ragbi > Zaščitna oprema za ragbi: Ščitniki za roke za rugby; Oklep za telo in ščitniki za ramena za ragbi; Ščitniki za dimlje za ragbi; Pokrivala za ragbi; Ščitniki za zobe za ragbi; Zaščitne kratke hlače in ščitniki za stegna za ragbi
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Ragbi > Zaštitna oprema za ragbi: Štitnici za ruke za ragbi; Panciri i štitnici za ramena za ragbi; Štitnici za prepone za ragbi; Štitnici za glavu za ragbi; Štitnici za zube za ragbi; Zaštitne hlače i štitnici za bedra za ragbi
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 英式橄榄球用品 > 英式橄榄球护具: 橄榄球护臂; 橄榄球防撞衣与护肩; 橄榄球护裆; 英式橄榄球头盔; 橄榄球护齿; 橄榄球防撞裤与护腿